Massachusetts, session 194th, S755.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 19 of chapter 32B of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by adding the following new subsection:-
(k) Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, an eligible municipal
employee who subscribes to the commission’s health insurance coverage within the first 10 days
of the employee’s first day of employment shall receive such coverage effective as of: (i) their
first day of employment; or (ii) the date on which the employee subscribes to the coverage,
whichever is later.
SECTION 2. The group insurance commission shall promulgate regulations necessary to
implement subsection (k) of section 19 of chapter 32B of the General Laws, as inserted by
section 1, not later than 3 months after enactment.
of 1